District of Columbia statutes.
34-1251.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment Amendment Act of 2015.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 101
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 2072(a), 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 substituted “Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment Amendment Act of 2015” for “Cable Television Reform Act of 2002.”
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2072(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).